Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 23 Wyoming Residential Mortgage Practices Act
§ 40-23-133.
Unique identifier; rulemaking.

The unique identifier of any person originating a residential mortgage loan shall be clearly shown on all residential mortgage loan applications forms, solicitations or advertisements, including business cards or websites and any other documents as established by rule of the commissioner.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.